Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB976.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1372(8)(i), (ii) and (iv) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 1372. Exceptional Children; Education and Training.--* * *(8) Reporting of Expenditures Relating to Exceptional Students.(i) By December 31, [2000] 2025, and each year thereafter, each school district shall compile information listing the number of [students with disabilities] children with exceptionalities for which expenditures are between twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), 123456789101112131415161718192021 which shall be known as Category 2; between fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), which shall be known as Category 3A; and over seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), which shall be known as Category 3B, for the prior school year. The information shall be submitted to the department in a form prescribed by the department. By February 1, 2001, and each year thereafter, the department shall submit to the chairman and minority chairman of the Education and Appropriations Committees of the Senate and the chairman and minority chairman of the Education and Appropriations Committees of the House of Representatives a report listing this information by school district. Beginning with the report due February 1, 2023, the department shall include the information reported in subparagraph (iv) along with the report made in this subparagraph and shall post the report on the department's publicly accessible Internet website in a sortable electronic format.(ii) By December 31, [2016] 2025, and each year thereafter, each school district shall compile information listing the number of [students with disabilities] children with exceptionalities for which expenditures are under twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), which shall be known as Category 1. The information shall be submitted to the department in a form prescribed by the department.* * *(iv) By December 31, [2022] 2025, and each year thereafter, each school district shall, in addition to the information under subparagraph (i), compile information listing the number of [students with disabilities] children with exceptionalities for which expenditures are under five thousand dollars ($5,000), 20250HB0976PN1059 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which shall be known as Category 1A; and between five thousand dollars ($5,000) and less than the amount in Category 2, which shall be known as Category 1B, for the prior school year. The information shall be submitted to the department along with the information in, and as prescribed by, subparagraph (i).* * *Section 2. Any regulations of the Department of Education that are inconsistent with this act are abrogated to the extent of the inconsistency.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0976PN1059 - 3 - 12345678910